Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Article 2. State Board of Social Services.

§ 63.2-215.
State Board of Social Services.

There shall be a State Board of Social Services consisting of 11 members appointed by the Governor. In making appointments, the Governor shall endeavor to select appointees of such qualifications and experience that the membership of the Board shall include persons suitably qualified to consider and act upon the various problems that the Board may be required to consider and act upon. The Board shall include a member from each of the social services regions of the state established by the Commissioner. At least one member of the Board shall be a licensed health care professional. The appointments shall be subject to confirmation by the General Assembly if in session and, if not, then at its next succeeding session.

The members of the Board shall be appointed for four-year terms, except that appointments to fill vacancies shall be for the unexpired term.

No person shall be eligible to serve for or during more than two successive terms; however, any person appointed to fill a vacancy may be eligible for two additional successive terms after the term of the vacancy for which he was appointed has expired. Members of the Board may be suspended or removed by the Governor at his pleasure.

The Board shall select a chairman from its membership, and under rules adopted by itself may elect one of its members as vice-chairman. It shall elect one of its members as secretary.

The Board shall meet at such times as it deems appropriate and on call of the chairman when in his opinion meetings are expedient or necessary, provided that the Board meet at least six times each calendar year.

A majority of the current membership of the Board shall constitute a quorum for all purposes.

The main office of the Board shall be in the City of Richmond.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-14, 63-15, 63-16, 63-18, 63-19, 63-20, 63-21, 63-22, 63-23; 1956, c. 104; 1968, cc. 465, 578, §§ 63.1-14, 63.1-15, 63.1-16, 63.1-18, 63.1-19, 63.1-20, 63.1-21, 63.1-22, 63.1-23; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1976 c. 217; 1980, c. 315; 1981, c. 21; 1998, c. 468; 2002, c. 747; 2012, cc. 803, 835; 2020, cc. 860, 861.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 78 provides: “That at least two individuals appointed to the State Board of Social Services pursuant to §

63.2-215

for terms beginning July 1, 2012, shall be representatives of child care centers.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on July 1, 2021, except that § 22.1-289.04 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective in due course.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 803 and 835, cl. 75, are identical, and in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “11 members” for “nine members,” deleted “and one member shall be a licensed health care professional” from the end of the third sentence, and inserted the fourth sentence; in the fifth paragraph, substituted “expedient or necessary, provided that the Board meet” for “expedient or necessary; provided, however, that the Board shall meet”; and deleted the former last paragraph, which read: “No director, officer or employee of an institution subject to the provisions of this title shall be a member of the Board.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 860 and 861, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and deleted “one member shall be a representative of stand-alone licensed child care centers that meet the accountability standards of state recognized accreditation pursuant to § 22.1-19, and one member shall be a representative of religiously exempt child care centers” from the first paragraph, penultimate sentence.

§ 63.2-216.
Powers and duties of Board in general.

In addition to such other duties as are assigned to it, the Board shall act in a capacity advisory to the Commissioner, and when requested shall confer and advise with him upon such matters as may arise in the performance of his duties. When requested by the Commissioner, or by the Governor, the Board shall investigate such questions and consider such problems as they, or either of them, may submit and shall report their findings and conclusions. The Board may also initiate investigations and consider problems and make recommendations to the Commissioner or to the Governor, of its own motion.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-24; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-24; 1981, c. 21; 1999, cc. 737, 763; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-217.
Board to adopt regulations.

The Board shall adopt such regulations, not in conflict with this title, as may be necessary or desirable to carry out the purpose of this title. Before the Board acts on a regulation to be published in the Virginia Register of Regulations pursuant to §

2.2-4007.05

, the Board shall examine the potential fiscal impact of such regulation on local boards. For regulations with potential fiscal impact, the Board shall share copies of the fiscal analysis with local boards prior to submission of the regulation to the Department of Planning and Budget for purposes of the economic impact analysis under §

2.2-4007.04

. The fiscal impact analysis shall include the projected costs and savings to the local boards to implement or comply with such regulation and, where applicable, sources of potential funds to implement or comply with such regulation.

The Board also may adopt such regulations to authorize local boards to destroy or otherwise dispose of such records as the local boards in their discretion deem are no longer necessary in such offices and that serve no further administrative, historical or financial purpose.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-25; 1956, c. 125; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-25; 1974, c. 507, § 63.1-238.5; 1976, c. 216; 1998, c. 558; 2002, cc. 391, 747; 2007, cc. 873, 916.

Cross references.

As to authority of the State Board of Social Services upon amendments of the federal Social Security Act or regulations of the Department of Health and Human Services, see §

63.2-406

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 391 amended § 63.1-25, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2002, c. 391 has been given effect in this section as set out above. The 2002 amendment by c. 391 substituted “H” for “G” preceding “of §

2.2-4007

” in the first paragraph.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 65 provides: “That effective July 1, 2013, the regulations of the Board of Social Services promulgated pursuant to §

63.2-217

, related to administration of auxiliary grants pursuant to §

63.2-800

, and adult services provided pursuant to Article 1 (§

63.2-1600

et seq.) and adult protective services provided pursuant to Article 2 (§

63.2-1603

) of Chapter 16 of Title 63.2 shall be administered by the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services and shall remain in full force and effect until the Commissioner for Aging and Rehabilitative Services promulgates regulations pursuant to the 64th enactment of this act.”

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 67 provides: “That as of July 1, 2012, the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services shall be deemed successor in interest to the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties. All right, title, and interest in and to any tangible personal property vested in the Department for the Aging and the Department of Rehabilitative Services to the extent that this act transfers powers and duties as of the effective date of this act shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Department for Aging and Rehabilitative Services.”

Acts 2017, c. 604, c. 1 provides: “That the State Board of Social Services shall promulgate regulations that require local departments of social services to respond to valid reports and complaints alleging suspected abuse or neglect of a child under the age of two within 24 hours of receiving such reports or complaints.”

Acts 2020, c. 848, cl. 1 provides: “The Department of Social Services shall convene a work group that includes representatives of assisted living facilities, advocates for residents of assisted living facilities, and other stakeholders to make recommendations to the Board regarding adoption of regulations for the audio-visual recording of residents in assisted living facilities, as defined in §

63.2-100

of the Code of Virginia, including provisions related to (i) resident privacy, (ii) notice and disclosure, (iii) liability, (iv) ownership and maintenance of equipment, (v) cost, (vi) recording and data security, and (vii) assisted living facility options for both assisted living facility-managed recording and resident-managed recording. The work group shall report its recommendations to the Governor, the Board of Social Services, and the General Assembly by December 1, 2020.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 6 provides: “That the regulations adopted by the State Board of Social Services to administer and implement the programs that are to be transferred from the State Board of Social Services to the Board of Education pursuant to this act shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended, or rescinded by the Board of Education.”

Acts 2020, cc. 860 and 861, cl. 7 provides: “That guidance adopted by the State Board of Social Services or Department of Social Services relating to programs to be transferred by this act shall remain in effect until amended or repealed.”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 873 and 916 are identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “2.2-4007.05” for “2.2-4007” and “§

2.2-4007

.04” for “subsection H of §

2.2-4007

.”

§ 63.2-217.1.
Board to amend regulations governing emergency response plans of assisted living facilities.

The Board shall amend its regulations governing emergency preparedness and response plans and temporary emergency electrical power sources of assisted living facilities to require the following:

Any assisted living facility that is equipped with an on-site emergency generator shall (i) include in its emergency preparedness and response plan a description of the emergency generator’s capacity to provide sufficient power for the operation of lighting, ventilation, temperature control, supplied oxygen, and refrigeration and (ii) test such emergency generator monthly and maintain records of such tests; and

Any assisted living facility that is not equipped with an on-site emergency generator shall (i) enter into an agreement with a vendor capable of providing the assisted living facility with an emergency generator for the provision of electricity during an interruption of the normal electric power supply; (ii) enter into at least one agreement with a separate vendor capable of providing an emergency generator in the event that the primary vendor is unable to comply with its agreement with the assisted living facility during an emergency; and (iii) have its temporary emergency electrical power source connection tested at the time of installation and every two years thereafter by a contracted vendor and maintain records of such tests.

The Department shall provide notice to all licensed assisted living facilities regarding the date by which such assisted living facilities must comply with the regulations promulgated pursuant to this section.

History.

2019, c. 91.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 91 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 63.2-218.
Board to adopt regulations regarding human research.

The Board shall adopt regulations to effectuate the provisions of Chapter 5.1 (§

32.1-162.16

et seq.) of Title 32.1 for human research, as defined in §

32.1-162.16

, to be conducted or authorized by the Department, any agency or facility licensed by the Department, or any local department. The regulations shall require the human research committee to submit to the Governor, the General Assembly, and the Commissioner at least annually a report on the human research projects reviewed and approved by the committee and shall require the committee to report any significant deviations from the proposals as approved.

History.

1992, c. 603, § 63.1-25.01; 2002, c. 747.

§ 63.2-219.
Board to establish employee entrance and performance standards.

The Board shall establish minimum education, professional and training requirements and performance standards for the personnel employed by the Commissioner and local boards in the administration of this title and adopt regulations to maintain such education, professional and training requirements and performance standards, including such regulations as may be embraced in the development of a system of personnel administration meeting requirements of the Department of Health and Human Services under appropriate federal legislation relating to programs administered by the Board. The Board shall adopt minimum education, professional and training requirements and performance standards for personnel to provide public assistance or social services.

The Board shall provide that the Department and its local boards or local departments shall not employ any person in any family-services specialist position that provides direct client services unless that person holds at least a baccalaureate degree. Such requirement shall not be waived by the Department, Board, or any local director or local governing body, unless such person has been employed prior to January 1, 1999, by the Department or its local boards or local departments in a family-services specialist position that provides direct client services.

The state grievance procedure adopted pursuant to Chapter 30 (§

2.2-3000

et seq.) of Title 2.2 shall apply to the personnel employed by the Commissioner. A local social services department or local board shall adopt a grievance procedure that is either (i) adopted by the locality in which the department or board is located, or in the case of a regional department or board, the grievance procedure adopted by one of its localities in the regional organization; or (ii) approved by the Board consistent with the provisions of Chapter 30 (§

2.2-3000

et seq.) of Title 2.2. The grievance procedure adopted by the local board shall apply to employees, including local directors, of the local boards and local departments.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 63-26, 63-136, 63-140.13, 63-158, 63-200; 1960, c. 440; 1962, c. 621; 1966, c. 112; 1968, cc. 578, 668, 670, §§ 63.1-26, 63.1-123; 1974, cc. 491, 504; 1975, cc. 176, 438; 1984, c. 781; 1990, c. 537; 1995, cc. 770, 818; 1999, c. 854; 2002, c. 747; 2004, c. 208; 2005, c. 714; 2014, c. 285.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 208, in the last paragraph, substituted “however, the grievance procedures adopted by localities pursuant to §§

15.2-1506

and

15.2-1507

shall apply to” for “and” and deleted the language “unless the local governing body elects to include employees of local departments and local boards under the grievance procedure adopted pursuant to §

15.2-1506

” at the end.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 714 rewrote the last paragraph.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 285, effective March 24, 2014, in the second paragraph substituted “family-services specialist” for “social work” in two places.

Law Review.

For discussion of Bockes v. Fields, 999 F.2d 788 (4th Cir. 1993).

which addresses Eleventh Amendment immunity of local social service boards, see “ The Fourth Circuit Review,” 51 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 331 (1994).

§ 63.2-220.
Board may administer oaths, conduct hearings and issue subpoenas.

The Board in the exercise and performance of its functions, duties and powers under the provisions of this title is authorized to hold and conduct hearings, issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of records, memoranda, papers and other documents, to administer oaths and to take testimony thereunder.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-27; 1968, c. 578, § 63.1-27; 2002, c. 747.

Cross references.

As to punishment for failing or refusing to obey subpoenas, see §

63.2-106

.

§ 63.2-221.
Board to investigate institutions at direction of Governor.

Whenever the Governor considers it proper or necessary to investigate the management of any institution licensed by or required to be inspected by the Board under the provisions of this title, he may direct the Board, or any committee or agent thereof, to make the investigation. The Board, committee or agent designated by the Governor shall have power to administer oaths and to summon officers, employees or other persons to attend as witnesses and to enforce their attendance and to compel them to produce documents and give evidence.

History.

Code 1950, § 63-33; 1968, c. 465, § 63.1-28.1; 2002, c. 747.